Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,121
Certificate of authority; expiration; renewal.

A certificate of authority issued pursuant to sections 44-32,119 and 44-32,120 shall expire on April 30 in each year and shall be renewed annually if the health maintenance organization has continued to comply with the laws of this state and the rules and regulations.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 30.